Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-101
State and county treasurers as fiscal agents; exception; bonds; where payable; coupon notes, interest on.

Except as provided in sections 10-134 to 10-141, the State Treasurer shall be the state fiscal agent, and all bonds and coupons issued by the state shall be made payable at the office of the State Treasurer. Except as provided in sections 10-134 to 10-141, the county treasurer shall be the county fiscal agent, and all bonds and coupons issued by any county, township, precinct, city, village, school district, or other political subdivision of a county shall be made payable at the office of the county treasurer, except that all revenue bonds and coupons of cities of the first class may at the discretion of such city be payable at the office of the city treasurer. If the interest on any such bonds is represented by coupon notes, such coupon notes shall contain a provision fixing the rate of interest they shall bear after due until they are paid. When any of the political subdivisions as above enumerated lies in two or more counties, the bonds shall be payable at the office of either one of the county treasurers as may be provided in the history and in the bonds or as provided in sections 10-134 to 10-141.

Laws 1913, c. 15, § 1, p. 78;

R.S.1913, § 365;

Laws 1917, c. 7, § 1, p. 60;

C.S.1922, § 282;

Laws 1925, c. 90, § 1, p. 270;

C.S.1929, § 11-101;

R.S.1943, § 10-101;

Laws 1967, c. 30, § 1, p. 148;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 1, p. 273;

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 10.